Florida, session 2026, HB613.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
31
32 Section 1. Subsection (7) is added to section 320.06,
33 Florida Statutes, to read:
34 320.06 Registration certificates, license plates, and
35 validation stickers generally.—
36 (7) The department shall establish and maintain a secure
37 online license and registration portal accessible to the
38 department, tax collectors, and authorized law enforcement
39 agencies for the purpose of verifying, recording, and processing
40 the seizure or confiscation of license plates under this
41 chapter. The portal must provide immediate status updates when a
42 plate has been seized, destroyed, or returned and must be
43 checked before reissuance of a registration or plate. The
44 department may adopt rules to implement this subsection.
45 Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 320.084, Florida
46 Statutes, is amended to read:
47 320.084 Free motor vehicle license plate to certain
48 disabled veterans.—
49 (3) The department shall, as it deems necessary, require
50 each person to whom a motor vehicle license plate has been
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb613-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 613 2026
51 issued pursuant to subsection (1) to apply to the department for
52 reissuance of his or her registration license plate. Upon
53 receipt of the application and proof of the applicant's
54 continued eligibility, the department shall issue a new
55 permanent disabled veteran motor vehicle license plate which
56 shall be of the colors red, white, and blue similar to the
57 colors of the United States flag. A disabled veteran who has
58 been issued a permanent disabled veteran motor vehicle license
59 plate may retain the unique alphanumeric designation assigned to
60 the plate upon reissuance, renewal, or transfer of the plate to
61 another vehicle owned by the veteran. The operation of a motor
62 vehicle displaying a disabled veteran license plate from a
63 previous issue period or a noncurrent validation sticker after
64 the date specified by the department shall subject the owner if
65 he or she is present, otherwise the operator, to the penalty
66 provided in s. 318.18(2). Such permanent license plate shall be
67 removed upon sale of the vehicle, but may be transferred to
68 another vehicle owned by such veteran in the manner prescribed
69 by law. Upon request of any such veteran, the department is
70 authorized to issue a designation plate containing only the
71 letters "DV," to be displayed on the front of the vehicle.
72 Section 3. Section 320.0843, Florida Statutes, is amended
73 to read:
74 320.0843 License plates for persons with disabilities
75 eligible for permanent disabled parking permits.—
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb613-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 613 2026
76 (1) Any owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who resides in
77 this state and qualifies for a disabled parking permit under s.
78 320.0848(2), upon application to the department, or the tax
79 collector as an authorized agent of the department, and payment
80 of the license tax for a motor vehicle registered under s.
81 320.08(2), (3)(a), (b), (c), or (e), (4)(a) or (b), (6)(a), or
82 (9)(c) or (d), shall be issued a license plate as provided by s.
83 320.06 which, in lieu of or in addition to the serial number
84 prescribed by s. 320.06, shall, at the option of the applicant,
85 be stamped with the international wheelchair user symbol or the
86 letters "DV" indicating a disabled veteran after the serial
87 number of the license plate. The license plate entitles the
88 person to all privileges afforded by a parking permit issued
89 under s. 320.0848. When more than one registrant is listed on
90 the registration issued under this section, the eligible
91 applicant shall be noted on the registration certificate.
92 (2) All applications for such license plates may must be
93 made to the department or the tax collector, and such plates may
94 be issued immediately on demand by the tax collector, subject to
95 rules of the department.
96 Section 4. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
97 320.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
98 320.26 Counterfeiting license plates, validation stickers,
99 mobile home stickers, cab cards, trip permits, or special
100 temporary operational permits prohibited; obscuring or altering
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb613-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 613 2026
101 license plates prohibited; penalty.—
102 (1)(a) A no person may not:
103 1. shall Counterfeit registration license plates,
104 validation stickers, or mobile home stickers, or have in his or
105 her possession any such plates or stickers.
106 2. ; nor shall any person Manufacture, sell, or dispose of
107 registration license plates, validation stickers, or mobile home
108 stickers in this the state without first having obtained the
109 permission and authority of the department in writing.
110 3. Manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or affix to any
111 registration license plate any cover, film, or overlay, whether
112 transparent, translucent, tinted, or opaque, which obscures or
113 alters the legibility, color, or design of the registration
114 license plate.
115 Section 5. Subsection (10) is added to section 322.21,
116 Florida Statutes, to read:
117 322.21 License fees; procedure for handling and collecting
118 fees.—
119 (10)(a) Any renewal or replacement driver license or
120 identification card ordered through the department's online
121 license and registration portal shall be fulfilled by the tax
122 collector of the county in which the applicant resides. The
123 department shall ensure that all online orders are transmitted
124 to the appropriate tax collector for fulfillment. The tax
125 collector may mail the driver license or identification card to
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb613-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 613 2026
126 the applicant or, at the option of the applicant, may allow the
127 applicant to pick up the driver license or identification card
128 at the tax collector's office.
129 (b) For purposes of s. 322.135(1)(c), fulfillment under
130 paragraph (a) constitutes services provided by the tax
131 collector. The department shall remit the service fee authorized
132 by s. 322.135(1)(c) to the appropriate tax collector for each
133 transaction fulfilled under paragraph (a).
134 Section 6. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
135 320.0848, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
136 320.0848 Persons who have disabilities; issuance of
137 disabled parking permits; temporary permits; permits for certain
138 providers of transportation services to persons who have
139 disabilities.—
140 (2) DISABLED PARKING PERMIT; PERSONS WITH LONG-TERM
141 MOBILITY PROBLEMS.—
142 (e) A person who qualifies for a disabled parking permit
143 under this section may be issued an international wheelchair
144 user symbol or "DV" license plate under s. 320.0843 in lieu of
145 the disabled parking permit; or, if the person qualifies for a
146 disabled veteran license plate under s. 320.084, such a license
147 plate may be issued to him or her in lieu of a disabled parking
148 permit.
149 Section 7. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb613-00